Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.100

Examination or investigation—Director's authority—Costs.

The director or the director's designee may at any time examine and investigate the business and examine the books, accounts, records, and files, or other information, wherever located, of any licensee or person who the director has reason to believe is engaging in the business governed by this chapter. For these purposes, the director or the director's designee may require the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the business or the subject matter of the investigation. The director or the director's designee may require the production of original books, accounts, records, files, or other information, or may make copies of such original books, accounts, records, files, or other information. The director or the director's designee may issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance and testimony, or the production of the books, accounts, records, files, or other information. The director shall collect from the licensee the actual cost of the examination or investigation.

[ 2003 c 86 s 16; 1994 c 92 s 283; 1991 c 355 s 10.]